Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1221.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 15 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8107. Duties of nonprofit corporations in public-private partnerships with the Commonwealth.A nonprofit corporation that enters into a public-private partnership with the Commonwealth by executive order shall have the following duties:(1) Comply with the disclosure requirements under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right- to-Know Law. (2) Submit an annual comprehensive financial report to the Office of the Governor and the General Assembly in 12345678910111213141516171819 accordance with the generally accepted accounting principles adopted by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board on the effective date of this paragraph . (3) Disclose on its publicly accessible Internet website each purchase made to or on behalf of the Governor and any other elected or appointed State official within 10 business days of each purchase.(4) Comply with the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (Public Law 107-204, 116 Stat. 745).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1221PN1369 - 2 - 12345678910